Tennessee, session 114, HB2133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 211, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
68-211-1201.
This part is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee Secondary Aluminum
Waste Management Act."
68-211-1202.
As used in this part:
(1) "Department" means the department of environment and
conservation; and
(2) "Secondary aluminum waste" means waste material or byproducts,
when disposed, containing aluminum generated from secondary aluminum
smelting operations and including aluminum dross, salt cake, baghouse dust
associated with aluminum recycling furnace operations, or dry-milled wastes.
68-211-1203.
(a) A person or an owner or operator of a solid waste landfill shall not commingle
municipal solid waste with secondary aluminum waste.
(b) Secondary aluminum waste may be disposed of in a landfill, but only in a
dedicated unit, which includes, but is not limited to, monofills and monocells, that has
been permitted for such specific purpose under this chapter.
HB2133
012433
- 1 -

(c) A person or an owner or operator of a solid waste landfill shall not add
secondary aluminum waste or municipal solid waste on top of waste in a previously filled
or closed unit, which includes, but is not limited to, monofills and monocells, and which
has been permitted for such specific purpose under this chapter, or in any other area
containing secondary aluminum waste. The department shall determine when a unit
must be designated as filled or closed pursuant to rules promulgated by the department
in setting operational and enforcement criteria for landfill units pursuant to subsection
(d).
(d) The department shall promulgate rules to implement this section. The rules
must:
(1) Include criteria for permitting dedicated secondary aluminum waste
landfill units and performance standards for the protection of human health and
the environment; and
(2) Be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
68-211-1204.
In addition to the requirements under § 68-211-1203(d), the department shall
promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act,
compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to effectuate the purposes of this part, including, but not
limited to, the establishment of permitting standards and to set operational criteria for
dedicated secondary aluminum waste landfill units. In promulgating the rules, the
department shall consider liner design, leachate control, monitoring, closure
requirements, and any other technical standard necessary to protect public health and
groundwater resources.
- 2 - 012433

SECTION 2. For the purpose of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon becoming
a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2026,
the public welfare requiring it, and applies to all secondary aluminum waste and municipal solid
waste disposed of after that date.
- 3 - 012433